test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PROG-yii-nagudiitlod_jump-down_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - nàgudiitłód[jump-down] :
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjSg1:       nàgudiyistłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjSg2:       nàgudiyíítłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjSg3:       nàgudáátłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1:       [nàgudiyiìtłíł, nàgudiyaàtłíł]
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1+Distr: [nàdàgudiyiìtłíł, nàdàgudiyaàtłíł]
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2:       nàgudiyastłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2+Distr: nàdàgudiyastłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3:       nàgugidáátłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3+Distr: nàdàgugidáátłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4:       nàguts'idáátłíł
    nàgudiitłód+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4+Distr: nàdàguts'idáátłíł
